Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 11 Facility Licensing and Employee Records Checks

Cross references.

Records check requirements for licensing of personal care homes, private home care providers, community living arrangements, and child welfare agencies, §

49-2-14.1

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Schedule of fees for fingerprint records check, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Administration, Chapter 290-1-5.

Enforcement of licensing requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Administration, Chapter 290-1-6.

31-7-250 through 31-7-265.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-3/SB 406, effective October 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

This article consisted of former Code Section 31-7-250 through 31-7-265, relating to facility licensing and employee records checks, and was based on Ga. L. 1985, p. 952, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 509, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 822, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 721, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1359, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 942, §§ 1—5, 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, §§ 2-19, 2-20/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-31/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 17/SB 178; Ga. L. 2012, p. 351, § 4/HB 1110; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-39/HB 642; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 8-12/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 3-3/HB 78; Ga. L. 2014, p. 444, § 2-9/HB 271; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, §§ 2-8, 2-9, 2-10/SB 336; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52.

Former Code Section 31-7-256, based on Ga. L. 1985, p. 952, § 2, was repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 942, § 6, effective July 1, 2002.

Former Code Section 31-7-257, based on Ga. L. 1985, p. 952, § 2, was repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 942, § 7, effective July 1, 2002.

Law reviews.

For note, “Give It to Me, I’m Worth It:
The Need to Amend Georgia’s Record Restriction Statute to Provide Ex-Offenders with a Second Chance in the Employment Sector,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 267 (2017).